Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1152.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Definitions.--As used in this act unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:* * *(bb) The term "source of income" means all lawful sources of income, including earned income, child support, alimony, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 insurance and pension proceeds, and all forms of public assistance, including Federal, State and local housing assistance programs.Section 2. Sections 5(h)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (8) and 5.3 of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Unlawful Discriminatory Practices.--It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification, or in the case of a fraternal corporation or association, unless based upon membership in such association or corporation, or except where based upon applicable security regulations established by the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania:* * *(h) For any person to:(1) Refuse to sell, lease, finance or otherwise to deny or withhold any housing accommodation or commercial property from any person because of the race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin [or], handicap or disability or source of income of any person, prospective owner, occupant or user of such housing accommodation or commercial property, or to refuse to lease any housing accommodation or commercial property to any person due to use of a guide animal because of the blindness or deafness of the user, use of a support animal because of a physical handicap of the user or because the user is a handler or trainer of support or guide animals or because of the handicap or disability of an individual with whom the person is known to have a relationship or association.* * *(2) Refuse to lend money, whether or not secured by mortgage 20260SB1152PN1405 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or otherwise for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of any housing accommodation or commercial property or otherwise withhold financing of any housing accommodation or commercial property from any person because of the race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or disability or source of income of any person, the use of a guide or support animal because of the blindness, deafness or physical handicap of the user or because the user is a handler or trainer of support or guide animals or because of the handicap or disability of an individual with whom the person is known to have a relationship or association.(3) Discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of selling or leasing any housing accommodation or commercial property or in furnishing facilities, services or privileges in connection with the ownership, occupancy or use of any housing accommodation or commercial property because of the race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or disability or source of income of any person, the use of a guide or support animal because of the blindness, deafness or physical handicap of the user or because the user is a handler or trainer of support or guide animals or because of the handicap or disability of an individual with whom the person is known to have a relationship or association.* * *(4) Discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of any loan of money, whether or not secured by mortgage or otherwise for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of housing accommodation 20260SB1152PN1405 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or commercial property because of the race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin [or], handicap or disability or source of income of any person, the use of a guide or support animal because of the blindness, deafness or physical handicap of the user or because the user is a handler or trainer of guide or support animals or because of the handicap or disability of an individual with whom the person is known to have a relationship or association.(5) Print, publish or circulate any statement or advertisement: (i) relating to the sale, lease or acquisition of any housing accommodation or commercial property or the loan of money, whether or not secured by mortgage, or otherwise for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of any housing accommodation or commercial property which indicates any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based upon race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or disability, source of income or because of the handicap or disability of an individual with whom the person is known to have a relationship or association, or (ii) relating to the sale, lease or acquisition of any housing accommodation or commercial property which indicates any preference, limitation, specification or discrimination based upon use of a guide or support animal because of the blindness, deafness or physical handicap of the user or because the user is a handler or trainer of support or guide animals.(6) Make any inquiry, elicit any information, make or keep any record or use any form of application, containing questions or entries concerning race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or 20260SB1152PN1405 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disability, source of income or because of the handicap or disability of an individual with whom the person is known to have a relationship or association in connection with the sale or lease of any housing accommodation or commercial property or loan of any money, whether or not secured by mortgage or otherwise for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of any housing accommodation or commercial property, or to make any inquiry, elicit any information, make or keep any record or use any form of application, containing questions or entries concerning the use of a guide or support animal because of the blindness, deafness or physical handicap of the user or because the user is a handler or trainer of support or guide animals, in connection with the lease of any housing accommodation or commercial property.* * *(8) Discriminate in real estate-related transactions, as described by and subject to the following:(i) It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in real estate-related transactions to discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction because of race, color, religious creed, ancestry, national origin, sex, age, handicap or disability, source of income, use of a guide or support animal because of a physical handicap or because the user is a handler or trainer of guide or support animals or familial status.(ii) Nothing in this act prohibits a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property to take into consideration factors other than race, color, religious creed, ancestry, national origin, sex, age, handicap or disability, 20260SB1152PN1405 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 source of income, use of a guide or support animal because of a physical handicap or because the user is a handler or trainer of guide or support animals or familial status.* * *Section 5.3. Prohibition of Certain Real Estate Practices.--It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice for any person to:(a) Induce, solicit or attempt to induce or solicit for commercial profit any listing, sale or transaction involving any housing accommodation or commercial property by representing that such housing accommodation or commercial property is within any neighborhood, community or area adjacent to any other area in which there reside, or do not reside, persons of a particular race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or disability, source of income, or who are guide or support animal dependent.(b) Discourage, or attempt to discourage, for commercial profit, the purchase or lease of any housing accommodation or commercial property by representing that such housing accommodation or commercial property is within any neighborhood, community or area adjacent to any other area in which there reside, or may in the future reside in increased or decreased numbers, persons of a particular race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or disability, source of income, or who are guide or support animal dependent.(c) Misrepresent, create or distort a circumstance, condition or incident for the purpose of fostering the impression or belief, on the part of any owner, occupant or prospective owner or occupant of any housing accommodation or 20260SB1152PN1405 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commercial property, that such housing accommodation or commercial property is within any neighborhood, community or area adjacent to any other area which would be adversely impacted by the residence, or future increased or decreased residence, of persons of a particular race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or disability, source of income, or who are guide or support animal dependent within such neighborhood, community or area.(d) In any way misrepresent or otherwise misadvertise within a neighborhood or community, whether or not in writing, that any housing accommodation or commercial property within such neighborhood or community is available for inspection, sale, lease, sublease or other transfer, in any context where such misrepresentation or misadvertising would have the effect of fostering an impression or belief that there has been or will be an increase in real estate activity within such neighborhood or community due to the residence, or anticipated increased or decreased residence, of persons of a particular race, color, familial status, age, religious creed, ancestry, sex, national origin, handicap or disability, source of income, or the use of a guide or support animal because of the blindness, deafness or physical handicap of the user.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1152PN1405 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324